parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-cities.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     names of cities	
!
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	12-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# OLD/tmp.cities
!# ADD/lexLocation.xip
!#
!# MARKERS 
!# !2 = in both sources
!# !* = from old FSTs
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj 

+City
+Capital

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abbr

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT 
Ablitas+Prop+City			XSG;
Adém+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Agrigento+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Agualva-Cacém+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT
Alcanena+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Alepo+Prop+City				MSG;	!2
Alexandria+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Alicante+Prop+City			XSG;
Alpiarça+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Alvito+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Amã+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;	!*
Améria+Prop+City			XSG;
Ancara+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
Antofagaste+Prop+City			XSG;
Antuérpia+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Arezzo+Prop+City			XSG;
Argel+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!*
Arrás+Prop+City				FSG;	!*
Arronches+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Assunção+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Astracã+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Ausburgo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Aveiro+Prop+City			MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Avinhão+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Avintes+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Babilónia+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Baçorá+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Bacu+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Baiona+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Baku+Prop+City+Capital			XSG;
Barcelos+Prop+City			MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Barrancos+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Basileia+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Basilicata+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Baurú+Prop+City				FSG;	!*
Beirute+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!*
Belém+Prop+City				FSG;	!2
Belgrado+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!*
Belo% Vale+Prop+City			XSG;
Benfica+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Berlim+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!*
Berna+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;	!*
Bilbau+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Bissau+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Bizâncio+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Blumenau+Prop+City			XSG;
Bogotá+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Bombaim+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Borba+Prop+City				FSG;	!2	!cc=PT	!vila
Bordéus+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Boston+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Braga+Prop+City				FSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Brazzaville+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
Brema+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Brindes+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Bristol+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Bruges+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Bucareste+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Cabo% Frio+Prop+City			XSG;
Cabul+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!*
Cáceres+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Cádis+Prop+City				MSG;	!2
Caiena+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Cairo+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!*
Caldelas+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Cambridge+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Campinas+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Campo% Maior+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Campos+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Cantão+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Cantuária+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Caracas+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Carachi+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Caraguatatuba+Prop+City			XSG;
Carrara+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Cartago+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Cartaxo+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT
Casablanca+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Cascais+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Castro% Verde+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Caxias+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Chamusca+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Cherburgo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Cister+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Claraval+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Coblença+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Cobo+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Coburgo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Colónia+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Compostela+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Conceição% da% Barra+Prop+City		XSG;
Constantina+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Copenhaga+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Corinto+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Coruche+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Cracóvia+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Cuba+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Daca+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!2  Capital Bangladesxh
Dacar+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!2
Damasco+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Díli+Prop+City+Capital			XSG;
Duas% Barras+Prop+City			XSG;
Edimburgo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Éfeso+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Epidauro+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Érice+Prop+City				XSG;
Esmirna+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Esteio+Prop+City			XSG;
Estocolmo+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!*
Estoril+Prop+City			MSG;	!2	!cc=PT	!vila
Estugarda+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Faial+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Famalicão+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Faro+Prop+City				MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Feira% de% Santana+Prop+City		XSG;
Flensburg+Prop+City			XSG;
Florença+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Freixo% de% Espada% à% Cinta+Prop+City	XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Funchal+Prop+City			MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Gagé+Prop+City				FSG;	!*
Ganda+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Gandra+Prop+City			XSG;
Glasgow+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Goiânia+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Grijó+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Guarda+Prop+City			FSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Hanói+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!*
Hanóver+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Hanôver+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Havre+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Hayward+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Helsínquia+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Herculano+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Hong% Kong+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Ibertioga+Prop+City			XSG;
Idanha-a-Velha+Prop+City		FSG;	!2	!cc=PT	!vila
Islamabad+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
Istambul+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Ivoti+Prop+City				XSG;
Jerusalém+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!2
Juatuba+Prop+City			XSG;
Kaiserslautern+Prop+City		MSG;	!*
Kinshasa+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
Lagoa% do% Ouro+Prop+City		XSG;
Lajes+Prop+City				MSG;	!2	!cc=PT	!vila
Lalim+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Lapa+Prop+City				FSG;	!*
Leninegrado+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Leomil+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Lobão+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Londres+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Lourdes+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Luneburgo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Lurdes+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Lusaka+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
Maceió+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Maia+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT
Malaca+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Mangualde+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT
Maputo+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!*
Marburgo+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Mauá+Prop+City				XSG;
Melburne+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Mesão% Frio+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Milão+Prop+City				MSG;	!2
Mirandela+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Módena+Prop+City			XSG;
Mondim% de% Basto+Prop+City		XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Montijo+Prop+City			MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Morão+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Moura+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT
Navarro+Prop+City			XSG;
Nazaré+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Nínive+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Niterói+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Nova% Jérsia+Prop+City			XSG;
Odivelas+Prop+City			FSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Olhão+Prop+City				XSG;	!cc=PT
Orão+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Ourique+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Ouro% Preto+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Oxford+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Palmela+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Pamplona+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Passabém+Prop+City			XSG;
Pegu+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Penalva% do% Castelo+Prop+City		XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Pérgamo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Perpinhão+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Petrogrado+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Phoenix+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Pinhel+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT
Pombal+Prop+City			MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Pompéia+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Port-Au-Prince+Prop+City+Capital	XSG;
Portimão+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Porto+Prop+City				MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Pouso% Alegre+Prop+City			XSG;
Póvoa% de% Varzim+Prop+City		FSG;	!*
Presburgo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Quarteira+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT
Ravena+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Rebordões+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Reguengos+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Ribeira% de% Pena+Prop+City		XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Ribimba+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Rio% Branco+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Rio+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Rostóvia+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Sabrosa+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Salerno+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Salonica+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Saltinho+Prop+City			XSG;
Sampetersburgo+Prop+City		MSG;	!*
San% Francisco+Prop+City		FSG;	!*
San% Sebastián+Prop+City		XSG;
Santander+Prop+City			XSG;
Santiago% de% Compostela+Prop+City	MSG;	!2
São% Galo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
São% João% de% Meriti+Prop+City		XSG;
São% Luís+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
São% Salvador+Prop+City			XSG;
São% Vicente% de% Paul+Prop+City	XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Sapiranga+Prop+City			XSG;
Saragoça+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Sarreburgo+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Selbach+Prop+City			XSG;
Sesimbra+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Setúbal+Prop+City			MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Sídon+Prop+City				FSG;	!*
Skopje+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
Socotorá+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Sodoma+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Sousel+Prop+City			XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
S.% Paulo+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Tânger+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Tarento+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Tashkent+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
Teresina+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Tolosa+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Tomar+Prop+City				MSG;	!*
Toronto+Prop+City			MSG;	!*
Trípolis+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Trofa+Prop+City				XSG;
Turim+Prop+City				MSG;	!2
Uberlândia+Prop+City			FSG;	!2
Varsóvia+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!*
Veranópolis+Prop+City			XSG;
Viena+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;	!*
Vila% Nova% de% Cerveira+Prop+City	XSG;	!cc=PT	!vila
Vintemilha+Prop+City			FSG;	!*
Viseu+Prop+City				MSG;	!2	!cc=PT
Xangai+Prop+City			MSG;	!2
Yaoundé+Prop+City+Capital		XSG;
